North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160D. Local Planning and Development Regulation.
Article 9. Regulation of Particular Uses and Areas.

Part 1. Particular Land Uses.

§ 160D-901.
Regulation of particular uses and areas.

A local government may regulate the uses and areas set forth in this Article in zoning regulations pursuant to Article 7 of this Chapter, a unified development ordinance, or in separate development regulations adopted under this Article. This shall not be deemed to expand, diminish, or alter the scope of authority granted pursuant to those Articles. In all instances, the substance of the local government regulation shall be consistent with the provisions in this Article. The provisions of this Chapter apply to any regulation adopted pursuant to this Article that substantially affects land use and development.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-902.
Adult businesses.

The General Assembly finds and determines that sexually oriented businesses can and do cause adverse secondary impacts on neighboring properties. Numerous studies relevant to North Carolina have found increases in crime rates and decreases in neighboring property values as a result of the location of sexually oriented businesses in inappropriate locations or from the operation of such businesses in an inappropriate manner. Reasonable local government regulation of sexually oriented businesses in order to prevent or ameliorate adverse secondary impacts is consistent with the federal constitutional protection afforded to nonobscene but sexually explicit speech.

In addition to State laws on obscenity, indecent exposure, and adult establishments, local government regulation of the location and operation of sexually oriented businesses is necessary to prevent undue adverse secondary impacts that would otherwise result from these businesses.

A local government may regulate sexually oriented businesses through zoning regulations, licensing requirements, or other appropriate local ordinances. The local government may require a fee for the initial license and any annual renewal. Such local regulations may include, but are not limited to, the following:

Restrictions on location of sexually oriented businesses, such as limitation to specified zoning districts and minimum separation from sensitive land uses and other sexually oriented businesses.

Regulations on operation of sexually oriented businesses, such as limits on hours of operation, open booth requirements, limitations on exterior advertising and noise, age of patrons and employees, required separation of patrons and performers, clothing restrictions for masseuses, and clothing restrictions for servers of alcoholic beverages.

Clothing restrictions for entertainers.

Registration and disclosure requirements for owners and employees with a criminal record other than minor traffic offenses and restrictions on ownership by or employment of a person with a criminal record that includes offenses reasonably related to the legal operation of sexually oriented businesses.

In order to preserve the status quo while appropriate studies are conducted and the scope of potential regulations is deliberated, local governments may enact moratoria of reasonable duration on either the opening of any new businesses authorized to be regulated under this section or the expansion of any such existing business. Businesses existing at the time of the effective date of regulations adopted under this section may be required to come into compliance with newly adopted regulations within an appropriate and reasonable period of time.

Local governments may enter into cooperative agreements regarding coordinated regulation of sexually oriented businesses, including provision of adequate alternative sites for the location of constitutionally protected speech within an interrelated geographic area.

For the purpose of this section, “sexually oriented business” means any business or enterprise that has as one of its principal business purposes or as a significant portion of its business an emphasis on matter and conduct depicting, describing, or related to anatomical areas and sexual activities specified in

G.S. 14-202.10

. Local governments may adopt detailed definitions of these and similar businesses in order to precisely define the scope of any local regulations.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-903.
Agricultural uses.

Bona Fide Farming Exempt From County Zoning. — County zoning regulations may not affect property used for bona fide farm purposes; provided, however, that this section does not limit zoning regulation with respect to the use of farm property for nonfarm purposes. Except as provided in

G.S. 106-743.4

for farms that are subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

, bona fide farm purposes include the production and activities relating or incidental to the production of crops, grains, fruits, vegetables, ornamental and flowering plants, dairy, livestock, poultry, and all other forms of agriculture, as defined in

G.S. 106-581.1

. Activities incident to the farm include existing or new residences constructed to the applicable residential building code situated on the farm occupied by the owner, lessee, or operator of the farm and other buildings or structures sheltering or supporting the farm use and operation. For purposes of this section, “when performed on the farm” in

G.S. 106-581.1

(6) includes the farm within the jurisdiction of the county and any other farm owned or leased to or from others by the bona fide farm operator, no matter where located. For purposes of this section, the production of a nonfarm product that the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services recognizes as a “Goodness Grows in North Carolina” product that is produced on a farm subject to a conservation agreement under

G.S. 106-743.2

is a bona fide farm purpose. For purposes of determining whether a property is being used for bona fide farm purposes, any of the following is sufficient evidence that the property is being used for bona fide farm purposes:

A farm sales tax exemption certificate issued by the Department of Revenue.

A copy of the property tax listing showing that the property is eligible for participation in the present-use value program pursuant to

G.S. 105-277.3

.

A copy of the farm owner’s or operator’s Schedule F from the owner’s or operator’s most recent federal income tax return.

A forest management plan.A building or structure that is used for agritourism is a bona fide farm purpose if the building or structure is located on a property that (i) is owned by a person who holds a qualifying farm sales tax exemption certificate from the Department of Revenue pursuant to

G.S. 105-164.13

E(a) or (ii) is enrolled in the present-use value program pursuant to

G.S. 105-277.3

. Failure to maintain the requirements of this subsection for a period of three years after the date the building or structure was originally classified as a bona fide farm purpose pursuant to this subsection subjects the building or structure to applicable zoning and development regulation ordinances adopted by a county pursuant to

G.S. 160D-702

in effect on the date the property no longer meets the requirements of this subsection. For purposes of this section, “agritourism” means any activity carried out on a farm or ranch that allows members of the general public, for recreational, entertainment, or educational purposes, to view or enjoy rural activities, including farming, ranching, historic, cultural, harvest-your-own activities, hunting, fishing, equestrian activities, or natural activities and attractions. A building or structure used for agritourism includes any building or structure used for public or private events, including, but not limited to, weddings, receptions, meetings, demonstrations of farm activities, meals, and other events that are taking place on the farm because of its farm or rural setting.

County Zoning of Residential Uses on Large Lots in Agricultural Districts. — A county zoning regulation shall not prohibit single-family detached residential uses constructed in accordance with the North Carolina State Building Code on lots greater than 10 acres in size and in zoning districts where more than fifty percent (50%) of the land is in use for agricultural or silvicultural purposes, except that this restriction does not apply to commercial or industrial districts where a broad variety of commercial or industrial uses are permissible. A zoning regulation shall not require that a lot greater than 10 acres in size have frontage on a public road or county-approved private road or be served by public water or sewer lines in order to be developed for single-family residential purposes.

Agricultural Areas in Municipal Extraterritorial Jurisdiction. — Property that is located in a city’s extraterritorial planning and development regulation jurisdiction and that is used for bona fide farm purposes is exempt from the city’s zoning regulation to the same extent bona fide farming activities are exempt from county zoning pursuant to this section. As used in this subsection, “property” means a single tract of property or an identifiable portion of a single tract. Property that ceases to be used for bona fide farm purposes becomes subject to exercise of the city’s extraterritorial planning and development regulation jurisdiction under this Chapter. For purposes of complying with State or federal law, property that is exempt from municipal zoning pursuant to this subsection is subject to the county’s floodplain regulation or all floodplain regulation provisions of the county’s unified development ordinance.

Accessory Farm Buildings. — A city may provide in its zoning regulation that an accessory building of a “bona fide farm” has the same exemption from the building code as it would have under county zoning.

City Regulations in Voluntary Agricultural Districts. — A city may amend the development regulations applicable within its planning and development regulation jurisdiction to provide flexibility to farming operations that are located within a city or county, voluntary agricultural district, or enhanced voluntary agricultural district adopted under Article 61 of Chapter 106 of the General Statutes. Amendments to applicable development regulations may include provisions regarding on-farm sales, pick-your-own operations, road signs, agritourism, and other activities incident to farming.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 22, 51(a), (b), (d); 2020-74, s. 20.

§ 160D-904.
Airport zoning.

Any local government may enact and enforce airport zoning regulations pursuant to this Chapter or as authorized by Article 4 of Chapter 63 of the General Statutes. Airport zoning regulations for real property within 6 miles of any cargo airport complex site subject to regulation by the North Carolina Global TransPark Authority are governed by

G.S. 63A-18

.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-905.
Amateur radio antennas.

A local government ordinance based on health, safety, or aesthetic considerations that regulates the placement, screening, or height of the antennas or support structures of amateur radio operators must reasonably accommodate amateur radio communications and must represent the minimum practicable regulation necessary to accomplish the purpose of the local government. A local government may not restrict antennas or antenna support structures of amateur radio operators to heights of 90 feet or lower unless the restriction is necessary to achieve a clearly defined health, safety, or aesthetic objective of the local government.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-906.
Bee hives.

Restrictions on bee hives in local development regulations shall be consistent with the limitations of

G.S. 106-645

.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-907.
Family care homes.

The General Assembly finds it is the public policy of this State to provide persons with disabilities with the opportunity to live in a normal residential environment.

As used in this section, the following definitions apply:

Family care home. — A home with support and supervisory personnel that provides room and board, personal care, and habilitation services in a family environment for not more than six resident persons with disabilities.

Person with disabilities. — A person with a temporary or permanent physical, emotional, or mental disability, including, but not limited to, an intellectual or other developmental disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism, hearing and sight impairments, emotional disturbances, and orthopedic impairments but not including persons with a mental illness who are dangerous to others as defined in

G.S. 122C-3(11)

b.

A family care home is deemed a residential use of property for zoning purposes and is a permissible use in all residential districts. No local government shall require that a family care home, its owner, or operator obtain, because of the use, a special use permit or variance from any such zoning regulation; however, a local government may prohibit a family care home from being located within a one-half mile radius of an existing family care home.

A family care home is deemed a residential use of property for the purposes of determining charges or assessments imposed by local governments or businesses for water, sewer, power, telephone service, cable television, garbage and trash collection, repairs or improvements to roads, streets, and sidewalks, and other services, utilities, and improvements.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d); 2021-88, s. 9(k).

§ 160D-908.
Fence wraps.

Fence wraps displaying signage when affixed to perimeter fencing at a construction site are exempt from zoning regulation pertaining to signage under this Article until the certificate of occupancy is issued for the final portion of any construction at that site or 24 months from the time the fence wrap was installed, whichever is shorter. If construction is not completed at the end of 24 months from the time the fence wrap was installed, the local government may regulate the signage but shall continue to allow fence wrapping materials to be affixed to the perimeter fencing. No fence wrap affixed pursuant to this section may display any advertising other than advertising sponsored by a person directly involved in the construction project and for which monetary compensation for the advertisement is not paid or required.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-909.
Fraternities and sororities.

A zoning regulation or unified development ordinance may not differentiate in terms of the regulations applicable to fraternities or sororities between those fraternities or sororities that are approved or recognized by a college or university and those that are not.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-910.
Manufactured homes.

The General Assembly finds that manufactured housing offers affordable housing opportunities for low- and moderate-income residents of this State who could not otherwise afford to own their own home. The General Assembly further finds that some local governments have adopted zoning regulations that severely restrict the placement of manufactured homes. It is the intent of the General Assembly in enacting this section that local governments reexamine their land-use practices to assure compliance with applicable statutes and case law and consider allocating more residential land area for manufactured homes based upon local housing needs.

For purposes of this section, the term “manufactured home” is defined as provided in

G.S. 143-145(7)

.

A local government may not adopt or enforce zoning regulations or other provisions that have the effect of excluding manufactured homes from the entire zoning jurisdiction or that exclude manufactured homes based on the age of the home.

A local government may adopt and enforce appearance and dimensional criteria for manufactured homes. Such criteria shall be designed to protect property values, to preserve the character and integrity of the community or individual neighborhoods within the community, and to promote the health, safety, and welfare of area residents. The criteria shall be adopted by ordinance.

In accordance with the local government’s comprehensive plan and based on local housing needs, a local government may designate a manufactured home overlay district within a residential district. Such overlay district may not consist of an individual lot or scattered lots but shall consist of a defined area within which additional requirements or standards are placed upon manufactured homes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preempt or supersede valid restrictive covenants running with the land. The terms “mobile home” and “trailer” in any valid restrictive covenants running with the land shall include the term “manufactured home” as defined in this section.

A local government may require by ordinance that manufactured homes be installed in accordance with the Set-Up and Installation Standards adopted by the Commissioner of Insurance; provided, however, a local government shall not require a masonry curtain wall or masonry skirting for manufactured homes located on land leased to the homeowner.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d); 2021-117, s. 6(a).

§ 160D-911.
Modular homes.

Modular homes, as defined in G.S. 105-164.3(143), shall comply with the design and construction standards set forth in

G.S. 143-139.1

.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-912.
Outdoor advertising.

As used in this section, the term “off-premises outdoor advertising” includes off-premises outdoor advertising visible from the main-traveled way of any road.

A local government may require the removal of an off-premises outdoor advertising sign that is nonconforming under a local ordinance and may regulate the use of off-premises outdoor advertising within its planning and development regulation jurisdiction in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Chapter and subject to

G.S. 136-131.1

and

G.S. 136-131.2

.

A local government shall give written notice of its intent to require removal of off-premises outdoor advertising by sending a letter by certified mail to the last known address of the owner of the outdoor advertising and the owner of the property on which the outdoor advertising is located.

No local government may enact or amend an ordinance of general applicability to require the removal of any nonconforming, lawfully erected off-premises outdoor advertising sign without the payment of monetary compensation to the owners of the off-premises outdoor advertising, except as provided below. The payment of monetary compensation is not required if:

The local government and the owner of the nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising enter into a relocation agreement pursuant to subsection (g) of this section.

The local government and the owner of the nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising enter into an agreement pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.

The off-premises outdoor advertising is determined to be a public nuisance or detrimental to the health or safety of the populace.

The removal is required for opening, widening, extending, or improving streets or sidewalks, or for establishing, extending, enlarging, or improving any of the public enterprises listed in

G.S. 160A-311

, and the local government allows the off-premises outdoor advertising to be relocated to a comparable location.

The off-premises outdoor advertising is subject to removal pursuant to statutes, ordinances, or regulations generally applicable to the demolition or removal of damaged structures.This subsection shall be construed subject to and without any reduction in the rights afforded to owners of outdoor advertising signs along interstate and federal-aid primary highways in this State as provided in Article 13 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

Monetary compensation is the fair market value of the off-premises outdoor advertising in place immediately prior to its removal and without consideration of the effect of the ordinance or any diminution in value caused by the ordinance requiring its removal. Monetary compensation shall be determined based on the following:

The factors listed in G.S. 105-317.1(a).

The listed property tax value of the property and any documents regarding value submitted to the taxing authority.

If the parties are unable to reach an agreement under subsection (e) of this section on monetary compensation to be paid by the local government to the owner of the nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising sign for its removal and the local government elects to proceed with the removal of the sign, the local government may bring an action in superior court for a determination of the monetary compensation to be paid. In determining monetary compensation, the court shall consider the factors set forth in subsection (e) of this section. Upon payment of monetary compensation for the sign, the local government shall own the sign.

In lieu of paying monetary compensation, a local government may enter into an agreement with the owner of a nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising sign to relocate and reconstruct the sign. The agreement shall include the following:

Provision for relocation of the sign to a site reasonably comparable to or better than the existing location. In determining whether a location is comparable or better, the following factors shall be taken into consideration:

The size and format of the sign.

The characteristics of the proposed relocation site, including visibility, traffic count, area demographics, zoning, and any uncompensated differential in the sign owner’s cost to lease the replacement site.

The timing of the relocation.

Provision for payment by the local government of the reasonable costs of relocating and reconstructing the sign, including the following:

The actual cost of removing the sign.

The actual cost of any necessary repairs to the real property for damages caused in the removal of the sign.

The actual cost of installing the sign at the new location.

An amount of money equivalent to the income received from the lease of the sign for a period of up to 30 days if income is lost during the relocation of the sign.

For the purposes of relocating and reconstructing a nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising sign pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, a local government, consistent with the welfare and safety of the community as a whole, may adopt a resolution or adopt or modify its ordinances to provide for the issuance of a permit or other approval, including conditions as appropriate, or to provide for dimensional, spacing, setback, or use variances as it deems appropriate.

If a local government has offered to enter into an agreement to relocate a nonconforming off-premises outdoor advertising sign pursuant to subsection (g) of this section and within 120 days after the initial notice by the local government the parties have not been able to agree that the site or sites offered by the local government for relocation of the sign are reasonably comparable to or better than the existing site, the parties shall enter into binding arbitration to resolve their disagreements. Unless a different method of arbitration is agreed upon by the parties, the arbitration shall be conducted by a panel of three arbitrators. Each party shall select one arbitrator, and the two arbitrators chosen by the parties shall select the third member of the panel. The American Arbitration Association rules shall apply to the arbitration unless the parties agree otherwise.

If the arbitration results in a determination that the site or sites offered by the local government for relocation of the nonconforming sign are not comparable to or better than the existing site, and the local government elects to proceed with the removal of the sign, the parties shall determine the monetary compensation under subsection (e) of this section to be paid to the owner of the sign. If the parties are unable to reach an agreement regarding monetary compensation within 30 days of the receipt of the arbitrators’ determination and the local government elects to proceed with the removal of the sign, then the local government may bring an action in superior court for a determination of the monetary compensation to be paid by the local government to the owner for the removal of the sign. In determining monetary compensation, the court shall consider the factors set forth in subsection (e) of this section. Upon payment of monetary compensation for the sign, the local government shall own the sign.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, a local government and an off-premises outdoor advertising sign owner may enter into a voluntary agreement allowing for the removal of the sign after a set period of time in lieu of monetary compensation. A local government may adopt an ordinance or resolution providing for a relocation, reconstruction, or removal agreement.

A local government has up to three years from the effective date of an ordinance enacted under this section to pay monetary compensation to the owner of the off-premises outdoor advertising provided the affected property remains in place until the compensation is paid.

This section does not apply to any ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004. A local government may amend an ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004, to extend application of the ordinance to off-premises outdoor advertising located in territory acquired by annexation or located in the extraterritorial jurisdiction of the city. A local government may repeal or amend an ordinance in effect on July 1, 2004, so long as the amendment to the existing ordinance does not reduce the period of amortization in effect on June 19, 2020.

The provisions of this section shall not be used to interpret, construe, alter, or otherwise modify the exercise of the power of eminent domain by an entity pursuant to Chapter 40A or Chapter 136 of the General Statutes.

Nothing in this section shall limit a local government’s authority to use amortization as a means of phasing out nonconforming uses other than off-premises outdoor advertising.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a)-(d).

§ 160D-913.
Public buildings.

All local government zoning regulations are applicable to the erection, construction, and use of buildings by the State of North Carolina and its political subdivisions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or local law or ordinance, except as provided in Part 4 of Article 9 of this Chapter, no land owned by the State of North Carolina may be included within an overlay district or a conditional zoning district without approval of the Council of State or its delegate.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-914.
Solar collectors.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no local government development regulation shall prohibit, or have the effect of prohibiting, the installation of a solar collector that gathers solar radiation as a substitute for traditional energy for water heating, active space heating and cooling, passive heating, or generating electricity for a residential property, and no person shall be denied permission by a local government to install a solar collector that gathers solar radiation as a substitute for traditional energy for water heating, active space heating and cooling, passive heating, or generating electricity for a residential property. As used in this section, the term “residential property” means property where the predominant use is for residential purposes.

This section does not prohibit a development regulation regulating the location or screening of solar collectors as described in subsection (a) of this section, provided the regulation does not have the effect of preventing the reasonable use of a solar collector for a residential property.

This section does not prohibit a development regulation that would prohibit the location of solar collectors as described in subsection (a) of this section that are visible by a person on the ground and that are any of the following:

On the facade of a structure that faces areas open to common or public access.

On a roof surface that slopes downward toward the same areas open to common or public access that the facade of the structure faces.

Within the area set off by a line running across the facade of the structure extending to the property boundaries on either side of the facade, and those areas of common or public access faced by the structure.

In any civil action arising under this section, the court may award costs and reasonable attorneys’ fees to the prevailing party.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-915.
Temporary health care structures.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Activities of daily living. — Bathing, dressing, personal hygiene, ambulation or locomotion, transferring, toileting, and eating.

Caregiver. — An individual 18 years of age or older who (i) provides care for a mentally or physically impaired person and (ii) is a first- or second-degree relative of the mentally or physically impaired person for whom the individual is caring.

First- or second-degree relative. — A spouse, lineal ascendant, lineal descendant, sibling, uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece and includes half, step, and in-law relationships.

Mentally or physically impaired person. — A person who is a resident of this State and who requires assistance with two or more activities of daily living as certified in writing by a physician licensed to practice in this State.

Temporary family health care structure. — A transportable residential structure providing an environment facilitating a caregiver’s provision of care for a mentally or physically impaired person that (i) is primarily assembled at a location other than its site of installation, (ii) is limited to one occupant who shall be the mentally or physically impaired person, (iii) has no more than 300 gross square feet, and (iv) complies with applicable provisions of the State Building Code and G.S. 143-139.1(b). Placing the temporary family health care structure on a permanent foundation shall not be required or permitted.

A local government shall consider a temporary family health care structure used by a caregiver in providing care for a mentally or physically impaired person on property owned or occupied by the caregiver as the caregiver’s residence as a permitted accessory use in any single-family residential zoning district on lots zoned for single-family detached dwellings.

A local government shall consider a temporary family health care structure used by an individual who is the named legal guardian of the mentally or physically impaired person a permitted accessory use in any single-family residential zoning district on lots zoned for single-family detached dwellings in accordance with this section if the temporary family health care structure is placed on the property of the residence of the individual and is used to provide care for the mentally or physically impaired person.

Only one temporary family health care structure shall be allowed on a lot or parcel of land. The temporary family health care structures under subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall not require a special use permit or be subjected to any other local zoning requirements beyond those imposed upon other authorized accessory use structures, except otherwise provided in this section. Such temporary family health care structures shall comply with all setback requirements that apply to the primary structure and with any maximum floor area ratio limitations that may apply to the primary structure.

Any person proposing to install a temporary family health care structure shall first obtain a permit from the local government. The local government may charge a fee of up to one hundred dollars ($100.00) for the initial permit and an annual renewal fee of up to fifty dollars ($50.00). The local government may not withhold a permit if the applicant provides sufficient proof of compliance with this section. The local government may require that the applicant provide evidence of compliance with this section on an annual basis as long as the temporary family health care structure remains on the property. The evidence may involve the inspection by the local government of the temporary family health care structure at reasonable times convenient to the caregiver, not limited to any annual compliance confirmation and annual renewal of the doctor’s certification.

Notwithstanding subsection (i) of this section, any temporary family health care structure installed under this section may be required to connect to any water, sewer, and electric utilities serving the property and shall comply with all applicable State law, local ordinances, and other requirements, including Article 11 of this Chapter, as if the temporary family health care structure were permanent real property.

No signage advertising or otherwise promoting the existence of the temporary health care structure shall be permitted either on the exterior of the temporary family health care structure or elsewhere on the property.

Any temporary family health care structure installed pursuant to this section shall be removed within 60 days in which the mentally or physically impaired person is no longer receiving or is no longer in need of the assistance provided for in this section. If the temporary family health care structure is needed for another mentally or physically impaired person, the temporary family health care structure may continue to be used or may be reinstated on the property within 60 days of its removal, as applicable.

The local government may revoke the permit granted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section if the permit holder violates any provision of this section or

G.S. 160A-202

. The local government may seek injunctive relief or other appropriate actions or proceedings to ensure compliance with this section or

G.S. 160A-202

.

Temporary family health care structures shall be treated as tangible personal property for purposes of taxation.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-916.
Streets and transportation.

Street Setbacks and Curb Cut Regulations. — Local governments may establish street setback and driveway connection regulations pursuant to

G.S. 160A-306

and

G.S. 160A-307

or as a part of development regulations adopted pursuant to this Chapter. If adopted pursuant to this Chapter, the regulations are also subject to the provisions of

G.S. 160A-306

and

G.S. 160A-307

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-25, s. 23, effective June 19, 2020.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, ss. 23, 51(a), (b), (d).

§§ 160D-917 through 160D-919.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4.

Part 2. Environmental Regulation.

§ 160D-920.
Local environmental regulations.

Local governments are authorized to exercise the powers conferred by Article 8 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes and Article 6 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes to adopt and enforce local ordinances pursuant to this Part to the extent necessary to comply with State and federal law, rules, and regulations or permits consistent with the interpretations and directions of the State or federal agency issuing the permit.

Local environmental regulations adopted pursuant to this Part are not subject to the variance provisions of

G.S. 160D-705

unless that is specifically authorized by the local ordinance.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).

§ 160D-921.
Forestry activities.

The following definitions apply to this section:

Development. — Any activity, including timber harvesting, that is associated with the conversion of forestland to nonforest use.

Forest management plan. — A document that defines a landowner’s forest management objectives and describes specific measures to be taken to achieve those objectives. A forest management plan shall include silvicultural practices that both ensure optimal forest productivity and environmental protection of land by either commercially growing timber through the establishment of forest stands or by ensuring the proper regeneration of forest stands to commercial levels of production after the harvest of timber.

Forestland. — Land that is devoted to growing trees for the production of timber, wood, and other forest products.

Forestry. — The professional practice embracing the science, business, and art of creating, conserving, and managing forests and forestland for the sustained use and enjoyment of their resources, materials, or other forest products.

Forestry activity. — Any activity associated with the growing, managing, harvesting, and related transportation, reforestation, or protection of trees and timber, provided that such activities comply with existing State rules and regulations pertaining to forestry.

A local government shall not adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution that regulates either of the following:

Forestry activity on forestland that is taxed on the basis of its present-use value as forestland under Article 12 of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes.

Forestry activity that is conducted in accordance with a forest management plan that is prepared or approved by a forester registered in accordance with Chapter 89B of the General Statutes.

This section shall not be construed to limit, expand, or otherwise alter the authority of a local government to:

Regulate activity associated with development. A local government may deny a building permit or refuse to approve a site or subdivision plan for either a period of up to:

Three years after the completion of a timber harvest if the harvest results in the removal of all or substantially all of the trees that were protected under local government regulations governing development from the tract of land for which the permit or approval is sought.

Five years after the completion of a timber harvest if the harvest results in the removal of all or substantially all of the trees that were protected under local government regulations governing development from the tract of land for which the permit or approval is sought and the harvest was a willful violation of the local government regulations.

Regulate trees pursuant to any local act of the General Assembly.

Adopt ordinances that are necessary to comply with any federal or State law, regulation, or rule.

Exercise its planning or zoning authority under this Chapter.

Regulate and protect streets.

History.

2019-111, s. 2.4; 2020-3, s. 4.33(a); 2020-25, s. 51(a), (b), (d).